Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 16 Plant Disease and Pest Control
2-16-212. Regulation of pests or diseases within state.

Whenever the State Plant Board shall find that there exists in this state or any part thereof any insect, disease, or noxious weed and that its dissemination should be controlled or prevented, the board may give notice thereof, specifying the plants and plant products infested, infected, or likely to become infested or infected therewith.

The movement, planting, or other use of any plant, plant products, or other thing or substance specified in the notice as likely to carry and disseminate the insect pest, disease, or noxious weed, except under such safeguard as may be provided in the rules made by the board, shall be prohibited within such area as may be designated in the public notice until the board shall find that the danger of the dissemination of the insect, disease, or noxious weed has ceased to exist, of which the board shall give public notice.

Before the order of prohibition shall be issued, a public hearing, with due public notice thereof, shall be held by the board, at which hearing interested persons may appear in person or by attorney.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 414, § 12; C. & M. Dig., § 8035; Acts 1937, No. 203, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 12343; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-111.

2-16-213. Receiving noncomplying plants, etc.

Any person in this state who receives any plant or plant product sold, given away, carried, shipped, or delivered for carriage or shipment within this state, as to which the requirements of §2-16-210 have not been complied with, shall immediately inform the State Plant Board or an inspector thereof and isolate and hold the plant product unopened or unused subject to such inspection and other disposition as may be provided for by the board.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 414, § 10; C. & M. Dig., § 8033; Pope's Dig., § 12341; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-109.

2-16-214. Review of rules, etc.

Any person affected by any rules made or notice given, under this subchapter, may have a review thereof by the State Plant Board for the purposes of having the rules or notice modified, suspended, or withdrawn, and, pending the review, the rules or notice shall be suspended.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 414, § 14; C. & M. Dig., § 8037; Pope's Dig., § 12345; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-113.

Subchapter 3

— Emergency Plant Act of 1921

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer [sic], it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

2-16-301. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Arkansas Emergency Plant Act of 1921”.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 519, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-117.

2-16-302. Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the terms and definitions set forth in §2-16-202 are adopted and made a part of this subchapter. In addition, the term “dangerous insect pest and plant diseases” shall be construed to mean such insect pests and plant diseases as the pink bollworm, the Mexican bean beetle, potato wart disease, “take all”, and such other insect pests and plant diseases, the prevalence of which would threaten an established agricultural industry in the state.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 519, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 12358; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-118.

2-16-303. Provisions supplemental.

This subchapter shall not be construed as limiting the authority conferred upon the State Plant Board by the Arkansas Plant Act of 1917, §2-16-201 et seq., but shall be construed as supplemental thereto.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 519, § 12; Pope's Dig., § 12368; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-128.

2-16-304. Penalties — Prosecution.

Any person who shall violate any provision of this subchapter or who shall interfere with any member of the State Plant Board or any inspector or employee while engaged in the performance of his or her duties under this subchapter shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Upon information furnished by the board, it shall be the duty of the Attorney General or the prosecuting attorney of the district in which an alleged violation of any provision of this subchapter may occur to enforce the provisions of this subchapter by proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction.

If the remedy elected to be pursued is by writ of injunction, no court of this state shall have the right to set aside or stay the writ of injunction before a hearing upon the merits.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment, in (a), inserted “or her” and “Class A” in the first sentence and deleted the former second sentence.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 519, § 8; Pope's Dig., § 12364; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-124; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 331.

2-16-305. Actions of agents.

In construing and enforcing the provisions of this subchapter, the act, omission, or failure of an official, agent, or other person acting for or employed by any person, association, partnership, or corporation within the scope of his or her employment or office shall, in every case, also be deemed the act, omission, or failure of the person, association, partnership, or corporation as well as that of the person acting as the agent.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 519, § 10; Pope's Dig., § 12366; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-126.

2-16-306. Enforcement.

The provisions of this subchapter and the rules promulgated hereunder shall be carried out by the Director of the State Plant Board, who shall serve without extra compensation.

The director may, with the approval of the State Plant Board, employ such inspectors or other employees as may be required and may incur such expenses as may be necessary, within the limits of the appropriation made by law or declared by the Governor.

For the purposes of carrying out the requirements of this subchapter, and the rules made and notices given pursuant thereto, the inspectors and employees of the Department of Agriculture shall have the right to enter into or upon any place and for purpose of inspection to open any bundle, package, or other container of plants, plant products, articles, or substances.

In the enforcement of this subchapter and of the rules made pursuant thereto, the board may summon witnesses; require the production of any books, papers, or documents it deems material; administer oaths; and hear witnesses.

It shall be the duty of each sheriff in the state to serve a summons when requested by the board.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “inspectors and employees of the Department of Agriculture” for “board and its inspectors and employees” in (b); and substituted “State Plant Board” for “board” in (c)(1).

The practical horticulturist.

The committee shall elect a chairperson.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, but there shall be present at every meeting at least one (1) of the members appointed by the Governor to represent the county concerned and not less than two (2) members of the board composing the committee.

The members of the committee shall serve without compensation, but may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

The committee shall engage such clerical and other help as may be necessary.

The committee shall investigate and cause a survey to be made to determine the claims of all persons whose property has been destroyed, damaged, or rendered unproductive in carrying out the provisions of this subchapter.

The committee shall submit each claim approved by it to the secretary of the board, who shall then issue for each claim a voucher for a warrant drawing on the State Treasury out of funds made available for the purpose, to the amount of the claims approved by the committee.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 519, §§ 3, 7, 9; Pope's Dig., §§ 12359, 12363, 12365; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 77-119, 77-123, 77-125; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 21, 22.

2-16-307. Infested zones — Emergency proclamation.

Upon satisfactory information acquired in any manner or upon information furnished by the State Plant Board, signed by the secretary and at least three (3) members thereof, showing that a dangerous insect pest or plant disease exists in the state or is in dangerous proximity thereto, the Governor shall issue a proclamation specifying the insect pest or plant disease. The proclamation shall declare such a pest or disease to be a dangerous insect pest or plant disease which threatens an agricultural industry. It shall specify the plants, plant products, articles, substances, and places capable of harboring or spreading the dangerous insect pest or plant disease and shall declare the zones or areas in which the danger exists.

Until such time as the Governor shall ascertain from the board, as provided above, and shall by proclamation declare that the emergency has ceased to exist, it shall be unlawful for any person to grow or maintain within those zones or areas any plants, plant products, articles, substances, or places infected or infested with a dangerous plant disease or insect pest or likely to become so infested or infected.

Plants, plant products, articles, substances, or places may be grown or maintained in the manner and method and under the conditions which shall be prescribed by rules made and promulgated by the board as provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 519, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 12360; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-120.

2-16-308. Infested zones — Regulation by State Plant Board — Destruction of plants, etc.

It shall be the duty of the State Plant Board, and the board is authorized and directed, when public safety will permit, to make and promulgate rules which shall permit and govern the growing and maintenance in any zones or areas mentioned in §2-16-307 of any plants, plant products, articles, substances, or places referred to in §2-16-307.

Whenever it shall be ascertained and determined by the board that any plants, plant products, articles, substances, or places are infested or infected or are so situated as to be subject to infestation or infection by a dangerous insect pest or plant disease, and thereby capable of spreading the infestation or infection, the board shall require the treatment, cutting, or destruction of the plants, plant products, articles, substances, or places.

If the owner, custodian, or occupant of the plants, plant products, articles, substances, or places referred to in this section cannot be found or shall, upon reasonable notice, fail or refuse to comply with the requirements of this subchapter, the requirements shall be carried out by the board and the expense thereof charged against the owner, custodian, or occupant.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 519, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 12361; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-121.

2-16-309. Claims committee.

Whenever property shall be damaged, destroyed, or rendered unproductive in carrying out the provisions of this subchapter, the Governor shall appoint a committee on claims for each county affected.

The committee shall consist of two (2) representatives of the county affected, and three (3) members of the State Plant Board, as follows:

The practical cotton grower;

The nurseryman; and

The members of the committee shall serve as long as the Governor shall deem their services to be necessary.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 519, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 12362; Acts 1985, No. 385, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-122; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 3.

2-16-310. Annual report.

The State Plant Board shall make an annual report to the Governor, in which report it shall give an account of the disposition of the appropriations which may be made for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 519, § 11; Pope's Dig., § 12367; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-127.

Subchapter 4

— Pesticide Control

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1975, No. 410, § 23, provided that the enactment of this subchapter would not have the effect of terminating or in any way modifying any liability, civil or criminal, that was already in existence on the date this subchapter became effective.

Cross References. Pest Control Law, §17-37-101 et seq.

Pesticide Use and Application Act, §20-20-201 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1975, No. 410, § 25: effective upon becoming law for purpose of adoption of rules and regulations; effective Jan. 1, 1976, for other purposes.

Acts 1993, No. 783, § 13: Mar. 29, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly meeting in Regular Session that the provisions of this act are of critical importance to the state's ability to continue the duties, responsibilities, and functions of the State Plant Board. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

2-16-401. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Arkansas Pesticide Control Act”.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-227.

2-16-402. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to regulate in the public interest the labeling, distribution, storage, transportation, and disposal of pesticides as defined in this subchapter.

Pesticides are valuable to our state's agricultural production and to the protection of man and the environment from insects, rodents, weeds, and other forms of life which may be pests; but it is essential to the public health and welfare that they be regulated to prevent adverse effects on human life and the environment.

New pesticides are continually being discovered, synthesized, or developed which are valuable for the control of pests and for use as defoliants, desiccants, plant regulators, spray adjuvants, and related purposes. However, such pesticides may be ineffective, may cause injury to man, or may cause unreasonable adverse effects on the environment.

Therefore, it is deemed necessary to provide for regulation of pesticides.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-229.

2-16-403. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Active ingredient” means any ingredient which will prevent, destroy, repel, control, or mitigate pests or which will act as a plant regulator, defoliant, desiccant, or spray adjuvant;

“Adulterated” shall apply to any pesticide if its strength or purity falls below the professed standard or quality as expressed on its labeling or under which it is sold, if any substance has been substituted wholly or in part for the pesticide, or if any valuable constituent of the pesticide has been wholly or in part abstracted;

“Animal” means all vertebrate and invertebrate species, including, but not limited to, man and other mammals, birds, fish, and shellfish;

“Beneficial insects” means those insects which during their life cycle are effective pollinators of plants, are parasites or predators of pests, or are otherwise beneficial;

“Defoliant” means any substance or mixture of substances intended for causing the leaves or foliage to drop from a plant, with or without causing abscission;

“Desiccant” means any substance or mixture of substances intended for artificially accelerating the drying of plant tissue;

“Device” means any instrument or contrivance, other than a firearm, which is intended for trapping, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pest or any other form of plant or animal life, other than man, and other than bacteria, virus, or other microorganism on or in living man or other living animals; but not including equipment used for the application of pesticides when sold separately from the sale of pesticides;

“Distribute” means to offer for sale, hold for sale, sell, barter, ship, deliver for shipment, or receive and having so received, deliver or offer to deliver, pesticides in this state;

“Environment” includes water, air, land, and all plants and man and other animals living therein, and the interrelationships which exist among these;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“Fungus” means any non-chlorophyll-bearing thallophytes, that is, all non-chlorophyll-bearing plants of a lower order than mosses and liverworts, for example, rusts, smuts, mildews, molds, yeasts, and bacteria, except those on or in living man or other living animals, and except those in or on processed food, beverages, or pharmaceuticals;

“Highly toxic pesticide” means any pesticide determined to be a highly toxic pesticide under the authority of Section 25(c)(2) of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136w(c)(2), or by the State Plant Board under § 2-16-406(a)(2);

“Imminent hazard” means a situation which exists when the continued use of a pesticide during the time required for cancellation proceedings under § 2-16-408 would likely result in unreasonable adverse effects on the environment or will involve unreasonable hazard to the survival of a species declared endangered by the United States Secretary of the Interior under P.L. 91-135;

“Inert ingredient” means an ingredient which is not an active ingredient;

“Ingredient statement” means:

Statement of the name and percentage of each active ingredient together with the total percentage of the inert ingredients in the pesticide; and

When the pesticide contains arsenic in any form, the ingredient statement shall also include percentages of total and water-soluble arsenic, each calculated as elemental arsenic. In the case of a spray adjuvant, the ingredient statement need contain only the names of the functioning agents and the total percentage of the constituents ineffective as spray adjuvants;

“Insect” means any of the numerous small invertebrate animals generally having the body more or less obviously segmented, for the most part belonging to the class insecta, comprising six-legged, usually winged forms, for example, beetles, bugs, bees, flies, and other allied classes of arthropods whose members are wingless and usually have more than six (6) legs, for example, spiders, mites, ticks, centipedes, and wood lice;

“Label” means the written, printed, or graphic matter on or attached to the pesticide or device or any of its containers or wrappers;

“Labeling” means the label and all other written, printed, or graphic matter:

Accompanying the pesticide or device at any time; or

To which reference is made on the label or in literature accompanying the pesticide or device, except to current official publications of the United States Environmental Protection Agency; the United States Department of Agriculture, the United States Department of the Interior, and the United States Department of Health and Human Services; state experiment stations; state agricultural colleges; and other similar federal or state institutions or agencies authorized by law to conduct research in the field of pesticides;

“Nematode” means invertebrate animals of the phylum nemathelminthes and class nematoda, that is, unsegmented round worms with elongated, fusiform, or sac-like bodies covered with cuticle and inhabiting soil, water, plants, or plant parts; they may also be called nemas or eelworms;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, association, fiduciary, corporation, or any organized group of persons whether incorporated or not;

“Pest” means:

Any insect, rodent, nematode, fungus, weed; or

Any other form of terrestrial or aquatic plant or animal life or virus, bacteria, or other microorganism except viruses, bacteria, or other microorganisms on or in living man or other living animals which the United States Environmental Protection Agency declares to be a pest under Section 25(c)(1) of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136w(c)(1), or which the board declares to be a pest under § 2-16-406(a)(1);

“Pesticide” means:

Any substance or mixture of substances intended for preventing, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pests;

Any substance or mixture of substances intended for use as a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant; and

Any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as a spray adjuvant;

“Plant regulator” means any substance or mixture of substances, intended through physiological action, for accelerating or retarding the rate of growth or rate of maturation or for otherwise altering the behavior of plants or the produce thereof. The term shall not include substances to the extent that they are intended as plant nutrients, trace elements, nutritional chemicals, plant inoculants, and soil amendments;

“Protect health and environment” means protection against any unreasonable adverse effects on the environment;

“Registrant” means a person who has registered any pesticide under the provisions of this subchapter;

“Restricted-use pesticide” means any pesticide or pesticide use classified for restricted use by the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency;

“Spray adjuvant” means any wetting agent, spreading agent, sticker, deposit builder, adhesive, emulsifying agent, deflocculating agent, water modifier, or similar agent intended to be used with any other pesticide as an aid to the application or to the effect thereof, and which is in a package or container separate from that of the pesticide with which it is to be used;

“State-restricted pesticide” means any pesticide or pesticide use which, when used as directed or in accordance with a widespread and commonly recognized practice, the board determines, subsequent to a hearing, requires additional restrictions for that pesticide or use to prevent unreasonable adverse effects on the environment, including humans, lands, beneficial insects, animals, crops, and wildlife, other than pests;

“Unreasonable adverse effects on the environment” means any unreasonable risk to humans or the environment, taking into account the economic, social, and environmental costs and benefits of the use of any pesticide;

“Weed” means any plant which grows where not wanted; and

“Wildlife” means all living things that are neither human, domesticated, nor, as defined in this subchapter, pests. “Wildlife” shall include, but not be limited to, mammals, birds, and aquatic life.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment repealed (10) and (11).

U.S. Code. The relevant provisions of Pub. L. No. 91-135 referred to in this section were codified as 16 U.S.C. §§ 668cc-1 — 668cc-6 and were repealed effective December 28, 1973. Provisions covering endangered species are generally codified as 16 U.S.C. § 1531 et seq. (Endangered Species Act of 1973.)

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-230; Acts 2019, No. 378, § 2.

2-16-404. Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this subchapter or a rule adopted under this subchapter shall be guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be punished for the first offense by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and for the second and any additional offense a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000).

Any offense committed more than three (3) years after a previous conviction shall be considered as a first offense.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment, in (a), substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” and “punished” for “punishable”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote (b).

Declare as a pest any form of plant or animal life, other than man and other than bacteria, viruses, and other microorganisms on or in living man or other living animals, which is injurious to health or the environment;

Determine whether pesticides registered under the authority of Section 24(c) of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136v(c), are highly toxic to man. The definition of “highly toxic” in 16 C.F.R. § 1500.3(b)(6)(i), as issued or hereafter amended, shall govern the board's determination;

Determine pesticides, and quantities of substances contained in pesticides, which are injurious to the environment. The board shall be guided by the United States Environmental Protection Agency regulations in this determination; and

Prescribe regulations requiring any pesticide registered for special local needs to be colored or discolored if it determines that the requirement is feasible and is necessary for the protection of health and the environment.

The board is authorized, after due notice and a public hearing, to make appropriate regulations where the regulations are necessary for the enforcement and administration of this subchapter. These regulations shall include, but not be limited to, regulations providing for:

The safe handling, transportation, storage, display, distribution, and disposal of pesticides and their containers;

Labeling requirements of all pesticides required to be registered under provisions of this subchapter. The regulations shall not impose any requirements for federally registered labels in addition to or different from those required under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136 et seq.;

Specifying those classes of devices which shall be subject to any provision of § 2-16-410.

For the purpose of uniformity and in order to enter into cooperative agreements, the board may:

Adopt restricted-use pesticides classifications as determined by the United States Environmental Protection Agency. In addition, the board may declare certain pesticides or pesticide uses as state-restricted pesticides when, after investigation and public hearing, it finds and determines the pesticide to be injurious to persons, animals, or vegetation other than the pest or vegetation which it is intended to destroy, or otherwise requires additional restrictions under the conditions set forth in § 2-16-403(29). The sale or distribution of such pesticides in Arkansas or their use in pest control or other operation is prohibited, except in accordance with such rules and regulations as may be made by the board after a public hearing. The rules and regulations may include rules and regulations prescribing the time when and the conditions under which the materials may be used in different areas in the state. The board, in its rules and regulations, may charge inspection and permit fees sufficient to cover the cost of enforcement of this subdivision (d)(1); and

Adopt regulations in conformity with the primary pesticide standards, particularly as to labeling and registration requirements, as established by the United States Environmental Protection Agency or other federal or state agencies.

Other necessary information required for completion of the board's application for registration form; and

A complete copy of the labeling accompanying the pesticide and a statement of all claims to be made for it, including the directions for use and the use classification as provided in the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136 et seq.

The board may prescribe other necessary information by rule.

The applicant desiring to register a pesticide shall pay an annual registration fee as prescribed in the rules of the board for each pesticide registered by the applicant. The annual registration fee shall be no less than sixty dollars ($60.00) for each product registered. All registrations shall expire December 31 each year.

Any registration approved by the board and in effect on December 31 for which a renewal application has been made and the proper fee paid shall continue in full force and effect until such time as the board notifies the applicant that the registration has been approved or denied, in accordance with the provisions of § 2-16-408. Forms for reregistration shall be mailed to registrants at least thirty (30) days before the due date.

Provided the board is certified by the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency to register pesticides to meet special local needs under Section 24(c) of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136v(c), the board shall require information set forth under subsections (b)-(e) of this section and shall register a pesticide if it determines that:

The pesticide's composition is such as to warrant the proposed claims for it;

The pesticide's labeling and other material required to be submitted comply with the requirements of this subchapter;

The pesticide will perform its intended function without unreasonable adverse effects on the environment;

When used in accordance with widespread and commonly recognized practice, the pesticide will not generally cause unreasonable adverse effects on the environment; and

The classification for general or restricted use is in conformity with Section 3(d) of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136a(d).

The board shall not make any lack of essentiality a criterion for denying registration of any pesticide. Where two (2) pesticides meet the requirements of this section, one (1) should not be registered in preference to the other.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (e) and “rules” for “regulations” in the first sentence of (f).

If it does not appear to the board that the pesticide is such as to warrant the proposed claims for it or if the pesticide and its labeling and other material required to be submitted do not comply with the provisions of this subchapter or regulations adopted hereunder, it shall notify the applicant of the manner in which the pesticide, labeling, or other material required to be submitted fails to comply with the provisions of this subchapter so as to afford the applicant an opportunity to make the necessary corrections.

If, upon receipt of the notice, the applicant does not make the required changes, the board may refuse to register the pesticide.

The applicant may request a hearing as provided for in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.;

When the board determines that a pesticide or its labeling does not comply with the provisions of this subchapter or the regulations adopted hereunder, it may cancel the registration of a pesticide after a hearing in accordance with the provisions of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.;

When the board determines that there is an imminent hazard, it may on its own motion suspend the registration of a pesticide in conformance with the provisions of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq. Hearings shall be held with the utmost possible expedition; and

Any person adversely affected by an order in this section may obtain judicial review of the order by filing in the circuit court, within sixty (60) days after the entry of the order, a petition praying that the order be set aside in whole or in part.

A copy of the petition shall be forthwith transmitted by the clerk of the court to the board, and then the board shall file in the court the record of the proceedings on which it based its order.

The court shall have jurisdiction to affirm or set aside the order complained of in whole or in part.

The findings of the board with respect to questions of fact shall be sustained if supported by substantial evidence when considered on the record as a whole.

Upon application, the court may remand the matter to the board to take further testimony if there are reasonable grounds for the failure to adduce such evidence in the prior hearing.

The board may modify its findings and order by reason of the additional evidence so taken and shall file the additional record and any modification of the findings or order with the clerk of the court.

If the board determines that any federally registered pesticide, with respect to its use in this state, requires further restrictions under § 2-16-406(d)(1), it may refuse to register or cancel or suspend the current registration of the pesticide in order to comply with such rules and regulations as may be adopted under § 2-16-406.

Provided the State Plant Board is authorized by the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency to issue experimental-use permits, the board may:

Regulations adopted under this subchapter as to experimental-use permits as authorized by the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136 et seq., shall not be inconsistent with the requirements of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act and regulations promulgated thereunder.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-244; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 8; 2019, No. 315, § 9.

2-16-405. Administration.

This subchapter shall be administered by the State Plant Board.

The administrative functions vested in the board by this subchapter shall be considered to be delegated to the employees of the Department of Agriculture or the department's authorized representatives on behalf of the board.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, §§ 2, 20; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 77-228, 77-246; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 23.

2-16-406. Powers of State Plant Board.

The State Plant Board is authorized, after due notice and an opportunity for a hearing, to:

The board is authorized to inspect pesticides wherever found and may sample and analyze or cause to be analyzed samples thereof, to determine compliance with this subchapter and the regulations adopted hereunder.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-235.

2-16-407. Pesticide registration required.

Each pesticide must have been accepted for registration by the State Plant Board, and the registration must be in force at the time it is sold, offered for sale, or distributed in this state. Registration is not required if a pesticide is shipped from one (1) plant or warehouse to another plant or warehouse operated by the same person and used solely at the plant or warehouse as a constituent part to make a pesticide which is registered under the provisions of this subchapter or if the pesticide is distributed under the provisions of an experimental use permit issued under §2-16-409 or an experimental use permit issued by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

The applicant for registration shall file a statement with the board which shall include:

The name and address of the applicant and the name and address of the person whose name will appear on the label, if other than the applicant's;

The name of the pesticide;

The board, when it deems it necessary in the administration of this subchapter, may require the submission of the complete formula of any pesticide, including the active and inert ingredients.

The board may require a full description of the tests made and the results upon which the claims are based on any pesticide not registered under Section 3 of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136a, or on any pesticide on which restrictions are being considered. In the case of renewal of registration, a statement shall be required only with respect to information which is different from that furnished when the pesticide was registered or last reregistered.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-232; Acts 1993, No. 783, § 7; 2019, No. 315, § 10.

2-16-408. Registration of pesticides for local needs.

Provided the State Plant Board is certified by the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency to register pesticides for those pesticides formulated to meet special local needs, the board shall consider the following for refusal to register, for cancellation, for suspension, or for legal recourse:

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-234.

2-16-409. Experimental-use permits.

Issue an experimental-use permit to any person applying for an experimental-use permit if it determines that the applicant needs that permit in order to accumulate information necessary to register a pesticide under §2-16-407;

Refuse to issue an experimental-use permit if it determines that the pesticide applications to be made under the proposed terms and conditions may cause unreasonable adverse effects on the environment;

Prescribe terms, conditions, and a period of time for the experimental-use permit which shall be under the supervision of the board; and

Revoke any experimental-use permit at any time if it finds that the permit's terms or conditions are being violated or that its terms and conditions are inadequate to avoid unreasonable adverse effects on the environment.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-233.